Massachusetts, session 194th, S1183.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 262 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended, in Section 8, subsection (a) by striking out sub, subsections (1) and (2) and
inserting in place thereof the following sections:-
(1) for service of an original summons, trustee process, subpoena or scire facias, either by
reading it or by leaving a copy thereof, $30 for each defendant upon whom service is made,
except as otherwise provided herein;
(2) for service of an original summons and complaint for divorce or for any other service
required to be served in hand, $45 for each defendant upon whom service is made;
of 1